Tennessee statutes. Title 3 Legislature
Part 1

Council on Pensions and Insurance

3-9-101. Creation — Membership.

There is hereby created a council on pensions and insurance to be composed of the following members, ex officio:

The speaker of the senate;

The speaker of the house of representatives;

The chair, chair emeritus and first vice chair of the committee on finance, ways and means of the senate; provided, that, if the office of the chair emeritus is vacant, the second vice chair;

The chair, vice chair and subcommittee chair of the committee on finance, ways and means of the house of representatives;

The comptroller of the treasury;

The commissioner of finance and administration;

The commissioner of personnel;

The state treasurer;

The director of retirement;

Three (3) members of the senate finance, ways and means committee, appointed by the chair of that committee and approved by the speaker of the senate; and

Three (3) members of the house finance, ways and means committee to be appointed by the chair of that committee and approved by the speaker of the house of representatives.

The three (3) members appointed from the house finance, ways and means committee and the three (3) members appointed from the senate finance, ways and means committee shall serve for their full term of office as members of the general assembly and until their successors are selected and qualified if reelected to either house of the general assembly. Members are eligible to succeed themselves as members of the committee. As terms expire, successors shall be selected during the fifteen-day organizational session of the general assembly.

Vacancies among the six (6) appointed members shall be filled in the same manner as in the original selection of members; provided, that if a vacancy occurs during a period of time when the general assembly is no longer in existence, the speaker of the respective bodies shall fill such vacancies.

All legislative members of the council on pensions and insurance shall be voting members; provided, that the recommendations of any nonlegislative members of the committee attending any meeting of the council shall be made a part of the minutes.

A quorum shall consist of seven (7) voting members.

No member of the council shall have a vote except elected representatives or senators and these votes must be public.

The speaker of the senate may designate a member of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives may designate a member of the house of representatives to serve as alternates to vote or otherwise act at council meetings in the absence of the respective speaker. A speaker participating in a council meeting through a designee shall be deemed present at such meeting for purposes of quorum requirements and voting.

The council shall elect from its members a chair, vice chair and any other officers as it considers necessary except the director of retirement, who shall serve as secretary of the council. The division of retirement shall furnish all secretarial, professional, technical and clerical services as required by the council; provided, that all professional and technical services relative to state insurance program issues shall be furnished by the state insurance staff as required by the council.

The council on pensions and insurance shall meet until the new members are duly appointed. The council on pensions and insurance can be called into session at any time by the chair or by a quorum of the council.

All bills pertaining to retirement and state insurance programs shall be referred to this committee for recommendation.

Members of the council on pensions and insurance who are also members of the general assembly shall each receive the same per diem and travel allowance provided by law for members of the general assembly in attending meetings of the general assembly and committees thereof.

For purposes of this chapter, “state insurance programs” means all insurance programs administered by the state insurance committee or the local education insurance committee pursuant to title 8, chapter 27.

Acts 1971, ch. 11, § 1; 1975, ch. 39, § 1; 1976, ch. 816, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-901; Acts 1980, ch. 501, §§ 1, 2, 6; 1989, ch. 179, §§ 1-4; 1993, ch. 317, § 1; 2013, ch. 236, § 93.

Compiler's Notes. The council on pensions and insurance, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§4-29-112,4-29-246.

Cross-References. Per diem and travel allowances for general assembly members, §3-1-106.

3-9-102. Powers and duties.

The council is authorized to establish its own rules, regulations and procedures and directed to:

Develop, establish and recommend pension and insurance standards and a coherent state policy on pensions and insurance, grounded in progressive and fundamental principles;

Continuously survey pension and insurance developments in other governments, in industry and business and periodically reappraise the state's policy and standards in view of such developments and changing economic and social conditions;

Continuously maintain a critical analysis of the federal social security program and evaluate its objectives and accomplishments;

Appraise pension and insurance provisions in force in Tennessee from time to time, along with those in other states and recommend such changes as considered necessary or advisable in the state's laws;

Review proposals from other sources for changes in the state's laws and transmit recommendations concerning them to the general assembly and the governor;

Submit suggested legislation or amendments to the general assembly and governor for the purpose of carrying out its recommendations; and

Adopt committee amendments as appropriate in regard to any proposed change in the state's law.

The role of the council on pensions and insurance, in reviewing the state insurance program, shall not include the administrative or day-to-day operations of the state insurance programs, including, but not limited to, the selection of vendors to provide services and the resolution of benefit disputes.

Acts 1971, ch. 11, § 2; 1975, ch. 39, § 2; T.C.A., § 3-902; Acts 1980, ch. 501, § 3; 1989, ch. 179, §§ 5, 6.

Attorney General Opinions. Public Employer's Amendment of Retirement Plan Affecting Vested Members. OAG 15-18, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 18 (3/12/15).

3-9-103. Review of pension and retirement system bills.

Whenever any bill is introduced in the general assembly proposing to establish a new pension system or to make any change in an existing system, or to make any change in the law which may have a financial impact on the Tennessee consolidated retirement system, the bill shall be referred to the council and to a standing committee; provided, that no action shall be taken on the bill by the standing committee until the council reports its recommendation and the actuarial cost of the bill.

Any bill which creates financial liability on the Tennessee consolidated retirement system or on any superseded system must contain the manner of funding for such liabilities created by the bill.

Whenever the council recommends a bill for passage only with the adoption of an amendment or amendments approved by a majority vote of the council, the council shall cause such committee amendment or amendments to be prepared in proper form and filed with the chief clerks of both houses of the general assembly in advance of any consideration of the bill on the floor and in the standing committee. The chief clerks of both houses shall cause the recommended amendment or amendments to be reproduced and placed upon the desk of all members of their respective houses and also upon the desk of all members of the standing committee of their respective houses. Bills reported out of the council shall not be considered by a standing committee unless the committee amendment of the council is attached to the bill.

The council shall not report for approval any bill which creates additional financial liabilities on the Tennessee consolidated retirement system or on any superseded system unless such bill is preceded by or accompanied by an appropriation bill or appropriate amendment prepared and attached, which provides the first year's funding, determined actuarially. However, technical adjustments accompanied by coincidental costs which are found necessary by the state's actuary may be made without regard to this section.

If a bill comes before the council without appropriate funding, the council may receive recommendations to provide for funding based on the above criteria. Consideration shall be given to increasing employee contributions to cover any additional costs.

All bills referred to the council shall be reported back to the standing committee to which they were assigned no later than five (5) weeks after the later of the dates adopted by the house of representatives or the senate for cutting off the introduction of new bills with appropriate amendments attached.

Acts 1971, ch. 11, § 3; 1975, ch. 39, § 3; 1977, ch. 379, § 1; T.C.A., § 3-903; Acts 1980, ch. 501, §§ 4, 5, 7; 1987, ch. 54, § 17; 1989, ch. 179, § 7; 2016, ch. 962, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. The 1982 General Appropriations Act, Acts 1982, ch. 916, § 15, Item 14, provides:

“Whenever any law relating to retirement matters is passed by the General Assembly which does not affirmatively state that it has application to participating political subdivisions and it is subsequently determined by the retirement division that such act or provisions thereof mandates increased liability to a participating political subdivision within the meaning of article II, § 24 of the Tennessee Constitution, compliance with the provisions of such act or acts shall be optional to the political subdivision. Upon discovery by the retirement division that an enactment increases liabilities to the local governments, notice of the effect of such enactment shall be given to the governing body by the retirement division within a reasonable time after discovery. The governing body of each political subdivision shall upon notification of the effect of the law, advise the retirement division of its desire to be covered by the provisions of the act within four (4) months of the date of notice. All participating political subdivisions which do not elect to be covered by the provisions of the enactment shall be excluded from the provisions thereof.”

Amendments. The 2016 amendment deleted the last sentence of (b) which read, “Accrued liability costs shall be actuarially determined on a period not exceeding twenty (20) years.”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 962, § 58. April 27, 2016.

3-9-104. Bills establishing or changing insurance programs.

Whenever any bill is introduced in the general assembly proposing to establish a new insurance program, or to make any change in any existing program, the bill shall be referred to the council and to a standing committee; provided, that no action shall be taken on the bill by the standing committee until the council reports its recommendation and the cost of the bill.

Whenever the council recommends a bill for passage only with the adoption of an amendment or amendments approved by a majority vote of the council, the council shall cause such committee amendment or amendments to be prepared in proper form and filed with the chief clerks of both houses of the general assembly in advance of any consideration of the bill on the floor and in the standing committee. The chief clerks of both houses shall cause the recommended amendment or amendments to be reproduced and placed upon the desks of all members of their respective houses, and also upon the desk of all members of the standing committee of their respective houses. Bills reported out of the council shall not be considered by a standing committee unless the committee amendment of the council is attached thereto.

All bills referred to the council shall be reported back to the standing committee to which they were assigned no later than five (5) weeks after the later date of the dates adopted by the house of representatives or the senate for cutting off the introduction of new bills with appropriate amendments attached.

Acts 1989, ch. 179, § 8.